Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 13. Hathaway Scholarship Program
§ 21-16-1304.
Hathaway opportunity, performance and honor scholarships.

Any student who meets the criteria under W.S.

21-16-1303

is eligible to receive a scholarship to pursue a degree or certificate as follows:

With a minimum cumulative high school GPA of 2.50 and a score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016 national percentile rank of forty-three (43) on a college entrance examination administered throughout the United States and relied upon by institutions of higher education to determine acceptance of students for attendance, a Hathaway opportunity scholarship for:

Eight hundred forty dollars ($840.00) per semester at an eligible institution if enrolled for twelve (12) or more semester hours;

The amount provided under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph times a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of hours for which the student is enrolled and the denominator is twelve (12), if enrolled at an eligible institution for at least six (6) and less than twelve (12) semester hours.

With a minimum cumulative high school GPA of 3.0 and a score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016 national percentile rank of fifty-six (56) on a college entrance examination administered throughout the United States and relied upon by institutions of higher education to determine acceptance of students for attendance, a Hathaway performance scholarship for:

One thousand two hundred sixty dollars ($1,260.00) per semester at an eligible institution if enrolled for twelve (12) or more semester hours;

The amount provided under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph times a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of hours for which the student is enrolled and the denominator is twelve (12), if enrolled at an eligible institution for at least six (6) and less than twelve (12) semester hours.

With a minimum cumulative high school GPA of 3.5 and a score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016 national percentile rank of seventy-nine (79) on an examination administered throughout the United States and relied upon by institutions of higher education to determine acceptance of students for attendance, a Hathaway honor scholarship for:

One thousand six hundred eighty dollars ($1,680.00) per semester at an eligible institution if enrolled for twelve (12) or more semester hours;

The amount provided under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph times a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of hours for which the student is enrolled and the denominator is twelve (12), if enrolled at an eligible institution for at least six (6) and less than twelve (12) semester hours.

Scholarships under this section shall be for a maximum of the equivalent of eight (8) full-time semesters. A scholarship under this section shall be available for attendance at a Wyoming community college for not more than a maximum of the equivalent of four (4) full-time semesters, except as follows:

As specified under subsection (g) of this section; or

A scholarship for a student enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program at a Wyoming community college shall be for a maximum of the equivalent of eight (8) full-time semesters.

To remain eligible for the scholarship under this section, the student shall:

Except as provided in W.S. 21-16-1303(f) and subsection (h) of this section, make satisfactory academic progress toward a degree. If a student fails to make satisfactory academic progress or maintain the cumulative grade point average required for continuation in the program as provided in this subsection, the student shall become ineligible for the scholarship in subsequent semesters unless granted an exception for cause by the department or except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this section. The department may delegate to any eligible institution the department’s authority to grant an exception for cause, but shall only do so in accordance with department rules establishing procedures and criteria for granting an exception and any eligible institution acting pursuant to such delegation shall grant exceptions only in accordance with those rules;

Except as provided in W.S. 21-16-1303(f) and subsections (f) and (h) of this section, maintain continuous enrollment for not less than two (2) semesters in each successive academic year. The department shall by rule and regulation establish exceptions to the requirement of this paragraph for military service, religious service and other good cause shown; and

Maintain a cumulative grade point average as evaluated at the end of each spring academic term as follows:

For Hathaway opportunity scholarships, at least a 2.25 GPA;

For Hathaway performance scholarships and Hathaway honor scholarships, at least a 2.50 GPA.

A student receiving a Hathaway honor scholarship or a Hathaway performance scholarship who fails to meet the GPA requirements of subsection (c) of this section necessary to maintain that scholarship may be awarded a Hathaway opportunity scholarship for attendance at an appropriate eligible institution if he meets the requirements necessary to maintain that scholarship.

The cumulative grade point average required under this section to maintain a scholarship shall be the student’s grade point average achieved at all eligible institutions after the student’s initial eligibility as determined under W.S. 21-16-1303(d).

If a student is otherwise eligible under this article and neither the applicable number of full-time equivalent semesters nor the maximum scholarship eligibility time period specified under subsection (b) of this section and W.S. 21-16-1303(d), including semesters for which a scholarship was not received, has been reached, a scholarship under this section which is lost may be reinstated if the student meets the applicable requirements imposed by this subsection and successfully completes courses at an eligible institution in a summer school session for which the student enrolled in at least six (6) semester hours or an academic term occurring during the period the scholarship is lost. A lost scholarship shall be reinstated in the first academic term following the academic term or summer school session during which the student:

Attains satisfactory academic progress as defined by W.S. 21-16-1301(a)(xiv) for a scholarship lost under this subsection for failure to meet the requirements of paragraph (c)(i) of this section; or

Achieves the cumulative grade point average required of the applicable scholarship under paragraph (c)(iii) of this section for a scholarship lost for failure to meet the requirements of paragraph (c)(iii) of this section; or

For a scholarship lost for failure to meet the requirements of (c)(ii) of this section, enrolls and completes one (1) academic term as a full-time or part-time student, whichever is applicable, occurring during the period in which the scholarship is lost.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, a scholarship received under this section for attendance at a Wyoming community college for four (4) full-time semesters may be extended for continued attendance at a Wyoming community college by a student who otherwise remains eligible for that scholarship under this article, and that student has earned a certificate or degree from a Wyoming community college or has otherwise successfully completed sufficient courses for eligibility to enroll in courses within a program offered by a Wyoming community college which leads to a professional degree. A scholarship extended under this subsection shall not exceed the maximum equivalent of eight (8) full-time semesters when combined with the four (4) full-time semesters of initial community college attendance under the scholarship and shall not support enrollment in coursework at an institution other than a Wyoming community college or the University of Wyoming.

Notwithstanding subparagraphs (a)(i)(B), (ii)(B) and (iii)(B) of this section, the applicable scholarship amount awarded to any eligible student may be available to that student, upon election, for enrollment in up to six (6) semester hours during any summer academic term or other academic term offered by an eligible institution outside of the regular fall or spring semester, subject to the following:

The amount provided under subparagraph (a)(i)(A), (ii)(A) or (iii)(A) of this section, as applicable, for enrollment in up to six (6) hours during any summer term or other academic term offered by an eligible institution shall be available in an amount equal to the proportion of the per semester scholarship amount that the number of semester hours enrolled bears to twelve (12);

The computation under paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be based upon that scholarship amount for which the student is qualified under this section at the time of his enrollment in the summer or other academic term pursuant to this subsection;

The amount paid under this subsection shall be included in computing the student’s total maximum scholarship amount under this section, as applied to that scholarship amount for which the student qualifies under this section at the time of his last eligible academic semester or semesters, as applicable;

Scholarships under this subsection shall not be included in computations for that student’s six (6) academic year limitation on scholarships under this section, his eight (8) or four (4) full-time semester equivalency limitation under subsection (b) of this section, as applicable, his satisfactory academic progress requirements under paragraph (c)(i) of this section, his continuous enrollment requirements under paragraph (c)(ii) of this section or in reinstating lost scholarships under paragraph (f)(iii) of this section;

The student’s hours of enrollment under this subsection shall be used to determine the state’s obligation to reimburse the eligible institution for the student’s scholarship as applied under this subsection, subject to W.S. 21-16-1308(a)(v) and rules and regulations of the department.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 1; 2007, ch. 110, § 1; 2008, ch. 96, § 1; 2011, ch. 85, § 1; 2014 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 131, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2016 ch. 15, § 1, effective March 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 199, § 1, effective March 15, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

in (c)(i) substituted “Except as provided in W.S. 21-16-1303(f), make” for “Make”; in (c)(ii) substituted “Except as provided in W.S. 21-16-1303(f), maintain” for “Maintain.”

Laws 2007, ch. 110, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 23, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

deleted “The scholarship under this article which is lost for failing to maintain the requisite grade point average shall be reinstated for the subsequent semester following attainment of the cumulative grade point average required of the applicable scholarship under paragraph (iii) of this subsection, provided that the student is otherwise eligible and neither the applicable maximum number of full-time equivalent semesters nor the maximum scholarship eligibility time period specified under subsection (b) of this section and W.S. 21-16-1303(d), including semesters for which a scholarship was not received, has been reached” at the end of (c)(i); added (f) and made related changes.

Laws 2008, ch. 96, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2008.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), inserted “Except as specified under subsection (g) of this section, a”; and added (g).

The 2014 amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, by ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2014, in (c)(i), inserted “and subsection (h) of this section” in the first sentence; in (c)(ii), substituted “and subsections (f) and (h) of this” for “and subsection (f) of this” in the first sentence; in the introductory paragraph of (f), inserted “for which the student enrolled in at least six (6) semester hours” in the first sentence; and added (h).

The second 2014 amendment, by ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2014, effective July 1, 2014, in (a)(i)(A), substituted “Eight hundred forty dollars ($840.00)” for “Eight hundred dollars ($800.00)”; in (a)(ii)(A), substituted “One thousand two hundred sixty dollars ($1,260.00)” for “One thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200.00)”; in (a)(iii)(A), substituted “One thousand six hundred eighty dollars ($1,680.00)” for “One thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600.00).”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both (have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2015 amendment,

in (h)(v), substituted “W.S. 21-16-1308(a)(v)” for “W.S. 21-16-308(a)(v).”

Laws 2015, ch. 131, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2016 amendment

, in (a)(i), substituted “score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016 national percentile rank of forty-three (43) on a college entrance examination administered throughout the United States and relied upon by institutions of higher education to determine acceptance of students for attendance” for “composite ACT score of at least nineteen (19)”; in (a)(ii), substituted “score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016 national percentile rank of fifty-six (56) on a college entrance examination administered throughout the United States and relied upon by institutions of higher education to determine acceptance of students for attendance” for “composite ACT score of at least twenty-one (21)”; and in (a)(iii), substituted “score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016 national percentile rank of seventy-nine (79) on an examination administered throughout the United States and relied upon by institutions of higher education to determine acceptance of students for attendance” for “composite ACT score of at least twenty-five (25).”

Laws 2016, ch. 15, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2016.

The 2019 amendment,

in (b), deleted the proviso in the second sentence, which read: "Except as specified under subsection (g) of this section," added "except as follows" at the end, added (b)(i) and (b)(ii), and made related changes.

Laws 2019, ch. 199, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2019.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 110, § 2, states: “The department of education, in consultation with the University of Wyoming and the community colleges, shall conduct an analysis of the administrative and fiscal feasibility of expanding student scholarships under the Hathaway scholarship program to include private in-state institutions and student scholarship enhancement based upon meritorious academic performance. The department, together with the university and colleges, shall report findings of the analysis and subsequent recommendations to the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint education interim committee on or before November 1, 2007.”

Laws 2011, ch. 85, §§ 2 and 3, provide: “Section 2. Any student receiving an opportunity, performance or honor scholarship whose initial year of eligibility as determined under W.S. 21-16-1303(d) occurred prior to the fall semester of the 2011-2012 academic year shall, for the 2011-2012 academic year and each academic year thereafter for which the student maintains scholarship eligibility under W.S.

21-16-1301

through

21-16-1310

, be entitled to extend community college attendance under his scholarship in accordance with this act.

“Section 3. (a) On or before November 1, 2011, the University of Wyoming and the Wyoming community college commission, in consultation with each Wyoming community college, shall report to the joint education interim committee and to the joint appropriations interim committee on the following with respect to students awarded Hathaway scholarships:

“(i) Standardization of remediation requirements for Wyoming high school graduates awarded a Hathaway student scholarship and enrolling in the university or a community college;

“(ii) Recommendations for improving student completion data, both for degrees and certificates, including comparisons between Hathaway scholarship recipients and the general student population, and improvement targets for all student completion and retention rates;

“(iii) Description of support services available to students requiring remediation, together with data on program effectiveness, and recommendations for improvement.”

Editor's Notes. —

2014 Wyo. Sess. Laws, Ch. 84, § 2 states as follows: “The department of education shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer scholarship payments to the University of Wyoming and Wyoming community colleges for purposes of this act in sufficient time for implementation in the 2014-2015 academic year.”

Applicability. —

Laws 2008, ch. 96, § 2, provides:

“This act shall apply to Hathaway scholarships lost during the 2006-2007 and 2007-2008 academic year for failure to make satisfactory academic progress, to maintain the required grade point average or for failure to maintain continuous enrollment, all as required by law, if the scholarship recipient otherwise remains eligible for the awarded scholarship pursuant to law and the applicable number of full-time equivalent semesters and the maximum scholarship eligibility time period specified by law, including any semesters for which a Hathaway scholarship was not received, have not been reached.”

§ 21-16-1305.
Hathaway provisional opportunity scholarships.

Any student who meets the criteria under W.S.

21-16-1303

is eligible to receive a Hathaway provisional opportunity scholarship to pursue a certificate or degree as follows:

With a minimum cumulative high school GPA of 2.50 and either a score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016 national percentile rank of thirty (30) on a college entrance examination administered throughout the United States and relied upon by institutions of higher education to determine acceptance of students for attendance or a qualifying cumulative score on a career-technical aptitude test as determined by the department, a scholarship for:

Eight hundred forty dollars ($840.00) per semester at a Wyoming community college if enrolled for twelve (12) or more semester hours;

The amount provided under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph times a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of hours for which the student is enrolled and the denominator is twelve (12), if enrolled at a Wyoming community college for at least six (6) and less than twelve (12) semester hours.

Scholarships under paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be for a maximum of the equivalent of four (4) full-time semesters;

A student who receives a scholarship under paragraph (i) of this subsection and who earns a certificate from the community college with a minimum cumulative GPA of 2.25 may extend the provisional opportunity scholarship to pursue either a certificate or a degree at a Wyoming community college or if the student earns a degree from the community college with a minimum GPA of 2.25, may extend the scholarship to pursue a degree at the University of Wyoming if the student maintains a minimum cumulative GPA of 2.25 and otherwise remains eligible for a scholarship under this article. A student who receives a scholarship under paragraph (i) of this subsection, is enrolled in a community college applied baccalaureate program and has received a minimum cumulative GPA of 2.25 after four (4) full-time semesters may extend the provisional opportunity scholarship for an additional four (4) full-time semesters to complete the baccalaureate degree if the student maintains a minimum cumulative GPA of 2.25 and otherwise remains eligible for a scholarship under this article. The scholarship under this paragraph shall be for the same amounts and subject to the same limitations as provided for scholarships under paragraph (a)(i) of this section, except that the student may continue a baccalaureate program or pursue either an additional certificate or a degree and the student may use this scholarship while attending a Wyoming community college or the University of Wyoming.

To remain eligible for the scholarship award under this section, the student shall:

Except as provided by W.S. 21-16-1303(f) and subsection (e) of this section, make satisfactory academic progress toward a certificate or degree. If a student fails to make satisfactory academic progress or maintain the cumulative grade point average required for continuation in the program provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection, the student shall become ineligible for the scholarship in subsequent semesters unless granted an exception for cause by the department or except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section. The department may delegate to any eligible institution the department’s authority to grant an exception for cause, but shall only do so in accordance with department rules establishing procedures and criteria for granting an exception and any eligible institution acting pursuant to such delegation shall grant exceptions only in accordance with those rules;

Except as provided by W.S. 21-16-1303(f) and subsections (d) and (e) of this section, maintain continuous enrollment for not less than two (2) semesters in each successive academic year. The department shall by rule and regulation establish exceptions to the requirement of this paragraph for military service, religious service and other good cause shown; and

Maintain a cumulative grade point average of at least 2.25 GPA, as evaluated at the end of each spring academic term for certificates or degrees that require more than one (1) academic year.

The cumulative grade point average required under this section to maintain a scholarship shall be the student’s grade point average achieved at all eligible institutions after the student’s initial eligibility as determined under W.S. 21-16-1303(d).

If a student is otherwise eligible under this article and neither the applicable number of full-time equivalent semesters nor the maximum scholarship eligibility time period specified under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section and W.S. 21-16-1303(d), including semesters for which a scholarship was not received, has been reached, a scholarship under this section which is lost may be reinstated if the student meets the applicable requirements imposed by this subsection and successfully completes courses at an eligible institution in a summer school session for which the student enrolled in at least six (6) semester hours or an academic term occurring during the period the scholarship is lost. A lost scholarship shall be reinstated in the first academic term following the academic term or summer school session during which the student:

Attains satisfactory academic progress as defined by W.S. 21-16-1301(a)(xiv) for a scholarship lost for failure to meet the requirements of paragraph (b)(i) of this section; or

Achieves the cumulative grade point average required under paragraph (b)(iii) of this section for a scholarship lost for failure to meet the requirements of paragraph (b)(iii) of this section; or

For a scholarship lost for failure to meet the requirements of paragraph (b)(ii) of this section, enrolls and completes one (1) academic term as a full-time or part-time student, whichever is applicable, occurring during the period in which the scholarship is lost.

Notwithstanding subparagraph (a)(i)(B) of this section, the scholarship amount awarded to any eligible student may be available to that student, upon election, for enrollment in up to six (6) semester hours during any summer academic term or other academic term offered by an eligible institution outside of the regular fall or spring semester, subject to the following:

The amount provided under subparagraph (a)(i)(A) of this section for enrollment in up to six (6) hours during any summer term or other academic term offered by an eligible institution shall be available in an amount equal to the proportion of the per semester scholarship amount that the number of semester hours enrolled bears to twelve (12);

The computation under paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be based upon that scholarship amount for which the student is qualified under this section at the time of his enrollment in the summer or other academic term pursuant to this subsection;

The amount paid under this subsection shall be included in computing the student’s total maximum scholarship amount under this section, as applied to that scholarship amount for which the student qualifies under this section at the time of his last eligible academic semester or semesters, as applicable;

Scholarships under this subsection shall not be included in computations for that student’s six (6) academic year limitation on his scholarship under this section, his four (4) year full-time semester equivalency limitation or extension thereof under paragraph (a)(iii) of this section, his satisfactory academic progress requirements under paragraph (b)(i) of this section, his continuous enrollment requirements under paragraph (b)(ii) of this section or in reinstating lost scholarships under paragraph (d)(iii) of this section;

The student’s hours of enrollment under this subsection shall be used to determine the state’s obligation to reimburse the eligible institution for the student’s scholarship as applied under this subsection, subject to W.S. 21-16-1308(a)(v) and rules and regulations of the department.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 1; 2007, ch. 110, § 1; 2008, ch. 96, § 1; 2009, ch. 204, § 1; 2014 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 131, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2016 ch. 15, § 1, effective March 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 28, § 1, effective February 15, 2019; 2019 ch. 199, § 1, effective March 15, 2019.

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 199 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

in (b)(i) substituted “Except as provided in W.S. 21-16-1303(f), make” for “Make”; in (b)(ii) substituted “Except as provided in W.S. 21-16-1303(f), maintain” for “Maintain.”

Laws 2007, ch. 110, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 23, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

deleted “The scholarship under this article which is lost for failing to maintain the requisite grade point average shall be reinstated for the subsequent semester following attainment of the cumulative grade point average required under paragraph (iii) of this subsection provided that the student is otherwise eligible and that neither the maximum number of full-time equivalent semesters nor the maximum scholarship eligibility time period specified under subsection (a) of this section and W.S. 21-16-1303(d), including semesters for which a scholarship was not received, has not been reached” at the end of (b)(i); added (d) and made related changes.

Laws 2008, ch. 96, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2008.

The 2009 amendment,

substituted “provisional opportunity scholarship to pursue a certificate or degree” for “career scholarship to pursue a certificate” in the introductory language of (a); and, in (a)(iii), substituted “may extend the provisional opportunity scholarship to pursue either a certificate or a degree at a Wyoming community college or if the student earns a degree from the community college with a minimum GPA of 2.25, may extend the scholarship to pursue a degree at the University of Wyoming” for “may receive an additional scholarship at a Wyoming community college to pursue either a certificate or a degree” and added “and the student may use this scholarship while attending a Wyoming community college or the University of Wyoming” at the end.

Laws 2009, ch. 204, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2009.

The 2014 amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, by ch. 84, §
1, effective July 1, 2014, in (b)(i), inserted “and subsection (e) of this section” in the first sentence; in (b)(ii), substituted “and subsections (d) and (e)” for “and subsection (d)” in the first sentence; in (d), inserted “for which the student enrolled in at least six (6) semester hours” in the first sentence; and added (e).

The second 2014 amendment, by ch. 119, §
1, effective July 1, 2014, in (a)(i)(A), substituted “Eight hundred forty dollars ($840.00)” for “Eight hundred dollars ($800.00).”

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2015 amendment,

in (e)(v), substituted “W.S. 21-16-1308(a)(v)” for “W.S. 21-16-308(a)(v).”

Laws 2015, ch. 131, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2016 amendment

, in (a)(i), substituted “score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016 national percentile rank of thirty (30) on a college entrance examination administered throughout the United States and relied upon by institutions of higher education to determine acceptance of students for attendance” for “composite ACT score of at least seventeen (17).”

Laws 2016, ch. 15, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2016.

The 2019 amendment,

in (a)(i), inserted "qualifying" preceding "cumulative score" and substituted "on a career-technical aptitude test as determined by the department" for "of at least twelve (12) points on applied math, reading for information and locating information on WORKKEYS tests."

Laws 2019, ch. 28, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2019.

The 2019 amendment, in (a)(iii), added the second sentence, and substituted "may continue a baccalaureate program or pursue" for "may pursue" in the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 110, § 2, states: “The department of education, in consultation with the University of Wyoming and the community colleges, shall conduct an analysis of the administrative and fiscal feasibility of expanding student scholarships under the Hathaway scholarship program to include private in-state institutions and student scholarship enhancement based upon meritorious academic performance. The department, together with the university and colleges, shall report findings of the analysis and subsequent recommendations to the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint education interim committee on or before November 1, 2007.”

Laws 2009, ch. 204, § 2, provides:

“(a) This act shall apply to scholarships available to eligible students graduating from high school in school year 2008-2009 and each school year thereafter.

“(b) Any student receiving a career scholarship whose initial year of scholarship eligibility as determined under W.S. 21-16-1303(d) occurred prior to the fall semester of the 2009-2010 academic year shall, for the 2009-2010 academic year and each academic year thereafter for which the student maintains scholarship eligibility under W.S.

21-16-1301

through

21-16-1310

, be entitled to receive the provisional opportunity scholarship in accordance with this act.”

§ 21-16-1306.
Need based scholarships.

In addition to scholarships made available under W.S.

21-16-1304

and

21-16-1305

there shall be made available a need based Hathaway scholarship as follows:

The scholarship shall be available only to students qualifying for a scholarship under W.S.

21-16-1304

or

21-16-1305

and for federal financial aid. The scholarships under this section shall be computed and awarded as follows:

If the student has annual unmet financial need of two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) or less - no award;

If the student has annual unmet financial need greater than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00):

If the student is eligible for a Hathaway honor scholarship - an award under this section in an amount equal to the annual unmet financial need exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000.00). A scholarship under this subdivision shall continue as long as the student remains eligible for a Hathaway honor scholarship;

If a student is eligible for a scholarship under this article but does not qualify under subdivision (I) of this subparagraph - an award equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the annual unmet financial need in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), but not to exceed one thousand five hundred seventy-five dollars ($1,575.00) per year.

A student qualifying for any award under this section shall receive a minimum amount of one hundred five dollars ($105.00) for each semester of qualification. One-half (1/2) of the annual award amount under this section shall be provided to the student at each semester of qualification;

For a student enrolled in a graduate degree program, an annual award provided under this section shall not exceed the University of Wyoming’s undergraduate cost of attendance for the applicable year less two thousand dollars ($2,000.00).

The department shall provide scholarships under this section from funds made available under W.S.

21-16-1302

and the state treasurer shall reimburse eligible institutions accordingly under W.S.

21-16-1308

. All requirements for scholarship recipients applicable under this article shall be applicable to scholarships under this section. The department, in consultation with each eligible institution, shall by rule designate a date for each academic year upon which each eligible institution shall make the final computation for unmet need for students receiving a scholarship under this section, consistent with each institution’s schedule for determining actual cost of attendance for students at that institution.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 1; 2014 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 40, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a)(i)(B)(II), substituted “one thousand five hundred seventy-five dollars ($1,575.00)” for “one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00)”; in (a)(i)(C), substituted “one hundred five dollars ($105.00)” for “one hundred dollars ($100.00).”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (a)(i)(D).

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (a)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.